Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1

Water Resources Division

69-7-101. Water resources division created — Appointment of director and assistants.

There is hereby created and established within the department of environment and conservation a division to be known as the water resources division.

The commissioner of environment and conservation shall, with the approval of the governor, appoint a director of the water resources division, who shall be known as the director of the water resources division, and such other professional and clerical assistants as may be required to discharge the duties imposed under this part upon the division.

The director of the water resources division shall be a registered professional engineer or have administrative experience and training or experience in the general field of water resources and hydraulics.

Acts 1957, ch. 19, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; 1972, ch. 860, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2001; T.C.A. §69-8-101.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the bureau of environment in the department of health and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee environmental statutes (excluding title 68, chs. 14, 110 and 112) from the department of health to the department of conservation and environment, see Executive Order No. 42 (February 4, 1991).

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

69-7-102. General duties of director.

The director of the water resources division is responsible to the commissioner of environment and conservation for the general direction of all matters pertaining to conservation, protection and development of the water resources of the state and the continued study of water resources looking toward the creation and development of a basic, long-range water resource policy for the state, with the exception of the functions relating to the water pollution control exercised by the Tennessee water pollution control board, and such other functions as may otherwise be provided in this part.

Acts 1957, ch. 19, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; 1972, ch. 860, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2002; T.C.A. §69-8-102.

69-7-103. Specific powers and duties of director.

The powers and duties of the director of water resources division under the direction of the commissioner of environment and conservation include, among other things, the powers and duties to:

Establish, maintain, and publish, as directed by the commissioner, an accurate inventory of the state's water resources;

Determine, maintain and establish estimates of existing and future water use in the state;

Define and propose, if necessary, water control districts within the state in the light of the director's findings, and make engineering plans and surveys for improving the quantity of the water supply in such proposed water control districts;

Implement the basic water resource policy of the state by creating and defining the rights of respective competing users of the water resources of the state;

Perform all duties assigned to the director relating to the determination of the waters that should be reserved for general public purposes, including navigation, sanitation, recreation, maintenance of fish and aquatic life, the maintenance of unusual scenic features and other public purposes;

Determine the feasibility of proposed dams and water diversion structures to conserve the basic water resources of the state and review and recommend plans for any such proposed dams and diversion structures in any proposed water control districts; and

Perform any other duties required by the terms of this part, or as may reasonably be required by the commissioner and the commission in relation to this part.

Acts 1957, ch. 19, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; 1972, ch. 860, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2003; T.C.A. §69-8-103.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Water Law, You Never Miss the Water Till the Well Runs Dry (Vincent A. Sikora), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1988).

69-7-104. Term of employment — Compensation.

The director of water resources division and such professional and clerical assistants as may be employed serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and their compensation is fixed and determined by the commissioner with the approval of the governor.

Acts 1957, ch. 19, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; Acts 1972, ch. 860, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-2004; T.C.A. §69-8-104.